District of Columbia statutes.
9-1009

Authority to negotiate extension of lease.

The Secretary and the Airports Authority may at any time negotiate an extension of the lease entered into under § 9-1004(a).

Oct. 30, 1986, 100 Stat. 3341-376, Pub. L. 99-591, § 6010
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-1001.
1981 Ed., § 7-1509.